Wisconsin, session 2025, SB354.
do enact as follows:SB354,11Section 1. 16.245 of the statutes is created to read:SB354,2,6216.245 Frozen federal aid; liens on federal property. If the secretary 3determines that federal aid to this state that was previously authorized under an 4act of Congress is being withheld under an executive order of the president of the 5United States or in contravention of a court order, the secretary shall do all of the 6following:SB354,2,97(1) Determine the approximate amount of federal aid this state is being or is 8expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the 9court order.SB354,2,1310(2) No later than 60 days after the date of the executive order or court order, 11submit to the governor and to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for 12distribution to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) a report that does all of the 13following:SB354,2,1614(a) Describes in detail the amount of federal aid this state is being or is 15expected to be deprived of as the result of the executive order or contravention of the 16court order, as determined under sub. (1).SB354,2,1817(b) Identifies properties located in this state that are owned by the federal 18government and upon which the state may obtain a lien.SB354,3,519(3) Request the attorney general to obtain a lien on one or more properties 1identified under sub. (2) (b) in a total amount not to exceed the approximate amount 2of federal aid this state is being or is expected to be deprived of as the result of the 3executive order or contravention of the court order, as determined under sub. (1). 4The attorney general shall attempt to obtain each such lien on behalf of the 5secretary in his or her official capacity.SB354,3,86(4) Authorize the release of all liens obtained by the attorney general under 7sub. (3) upon the state’s receipt of all federal aid previously withheld under the 8executive order or in contravention of the court order.SB354,3,99